Louisiana, session 2026, HB656.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:830.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§830.4. Access to Programming Pilot Program; establishment
A. Subject to the availability of funds and appropriate resources, the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections is hereby authorized to establish the
Access to Programming Pilot Program, to be administered by inmates who are
qualified and approved by the department, for the purpose of making programming
available to all of the following:
(1) Juvenile offenders.
(2) Inmates sentenced to the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
who are in the custody of the sheriff at a parish prison or jail.
B. The programming shall include all of the following topics:
(1) Rehabilitation services that encompass educational and vocational
opportunities.
(2) Mental health services.
(3) Suicide awareness and prevention.
C. The department shall provide attendance options as follows:
(1) Through simultaneous audio-visual transmission for juveniles housed in
juvenile facilities.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 656 ENROLLED
(2) In-person or through simultaneous audio-visual transmission for inmates
housed in parish prisons or jails.
D. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall adopt rules and
regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the
provisions of this Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.